Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1172.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. (a) The sum of $31,560,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the Trustees of the University of Pennsylvania for the fiscal year July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027, for veterinary activities.(b) The sum of $1,793,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to the Trustees of the University of Pennsylvania for the fiscal year July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027, for the Center for Infectious Diseases.Section 2. (a) Payments to the University of Pennsylvania on account of the appropriations provided in section 1 shall be made quarterly by the Secretary of Agriculture on the basis of costs during the fiscal year and shall be conditioned on continuing authority for inclusion on the Board of Trustees of the University of Pennsylvania of a minimum of four persons who 123456789101112131415161718 are not elected officials and who are appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives for terms of office coterminous with that of the respective appointing authority; and shall be further conditioned on these appointees receiving full voting rights as members of the board of trustees.(b) The University of Pennsylvania shall provide full, complete and accurate information as may be required by the Department of Agriculture or the chairman or the minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate or the chairman or the minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) The University of Pennsylvania shall report its revenues and expenditures and present its financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and procedures for educational institutions as stated in the "Higher Education Finance Manual (1975)" and the "Commonwealth of Pennsylvania Budget Instructions for the State System of Higher Education, State-Related Universities and Non-State-Related Colleges and Universities."(d) The Trustees of the University of Pennsylvania shall report on forms provided by the Department of Agriculture to both the chairman and minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairman and minority chairman of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives by September 30, 2027, on how State-appropriated funds were expended for fiscal year 2026-2027 to reduce the costs to Pennsylvania resident students or to provide services to Pennsylvania residents.20260SB1172PN1453 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260SB1172PN1453 - 3 - 12